Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1104
Applicator, defined.

Applicator shall mean any person engaged in the application of chemicals by means of chemigation. Applicator shall include any person operating equipment used for chemigation whether for himself or herself or on behalf of the permitholder for the land on which the chemigation will take place.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 4.